Utah statutes.
67-1a-6.   Designation as secretary of state -- Duties.

(1) When required by local, state, federal, or international law, the lieutenant governor is hereby designated the secretary of state of Utah and shall perform the duties and functions required by such laws, including attesting or certifying documents, recording or filing laws, documents, and other papers; and receiving appointments for service of legal process as provided by law.

(2)  Any reference in the laws of the state to the office of the secretary of state is a reference to the office of lieutenant governor.

